Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1603.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Reliable Acceptance Testing of Concrete Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ACI." The American Concrete Institute."ASTM." ASTM International."Contractor." A person, firm or corporation with which an owner enters into an agreement for the construction of a project."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the 123456789101112131415161718 Commonwealth."Owner's testing agency." A firm or entity under contract with an owner to provide testing services for quality assurance and compliance with the requirements of ASTM C1077.Section 3. Sampling and initial curing of concrete samples.(a) Requirement.--A contractor and owner's testing agency shall provide for the casting of concrete test specimens for the purpose of acceptance of concrete and for the initial curing of concrete test specimens at a project site on commercial construction projects as provided under this section.(b) Duties of owner's testing agency.--The owner's testing agency shall:(1) Obtain samples of concrete in accordance with ASTM C172 and cast test specimens in accordance with ASTM C31.(2) Cure test specimens, monitor and report curing conditions for conformance with the requirements of ASTM C31 and as provided under this section.(3) Provide a container for the storage of test specimens at the project site that will facilitate conformance to the storage and initial curing requirements of ASTM C31.(4) Store the test specimens in the initial curing container and maintain the required temperature and moisture conditions during the initial curing period as defined in the standard curing requirements of ASTM C31.(5) Transport test specimens from the project site to the testing location in accordance with the requirements of ASTM C31.(6) Maintain the test specimens at a laboratory in accordance with the final curing section for standard curing 20250HB1603PN1919 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the requirements of ASTM C31.(7) Test the specimens for strength in accordance with the requirements of ASTM C39.(c) Duties of contractor.--A contractor shall provide at least 110 volts of power and water and space for the initial curing container for use by the owner's testing agency, security and timely access to the storage location of the concrete test specimens.(d) Initial curing of test specimens.--The initial curing of test specimens shall be conducted as follows:(1) The initial curing environment surrounding test specimens shall be monitored by a digital system that records temperature at least every hour, within the range of 30 degrees Fahrenheit to 120 degrees Fahrenheit and to an accuracy of 1 degree Fahrenheit, and provide software to access the stored data.(2) When requested, the output from the automated temperature measuring device shall be made available in real time to the contractor, concrete supplier, concrete special inspector, licensed design professional and building code official. The output from the automated temperature device shall be included in the concrete strength report issued by the owner's testing agency.(e) Technician requirements.--Sampling, casting of test specimens and providing, maintaining and monitoring of initial curing shall be conducted by a technician holding a current ACI Grade I Concrete Field Testing Technician certification.(f) Final curing and testing of specimens.--Final curing and testing of specimens for strength shall be done in accordance with the requirements of ASTM C31 and ASTM C39 by a technician 20250HB1603PN1919 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 holding a current ACI Concrete Strength Testing Technician certification.Section 4. Enforcement.The department shall enforce the provisions of this act.Section 5. Penalties.A person who violates this act shall be subject to the following:(1) For a first violation, a warning.(2) For a second violation, a fine of $500.(3) For a third violation, a fine of $1,000 and inclusion on a list of violators posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website for a period of one year.(4) For a fourth and subsequent violation, a fine of $2,000 and inclusion on a list of violators posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website for a period of one year for each violation.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1603PN1919 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819